Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1078
Cosmetology establishment; license required; conditions.

No person shall operate or profess or attempt to operate a cosmetology establishment unless such establishment is licensed by the department under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act. The department shall not issue or renew a license for a cosmetology establishment until all requirements of the act have been complied with. No person shall engage in any of the practices of cosmetology in any location or premises other than a licensed cosmetology establishment except as specifically permitted in the act.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 80;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,119;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 340.